Illinois, session 104th, HB5012.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Hijacking and Motor 5Vehicle Theft Prevention and Insurance Verification Act is 6amended by changing Section 8 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 4005/8)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 1308)8    Sec. 8. (a) A special fund is created in the State Treasury 9known as the Vehicle Hijacking and Motor Vehicle Theft 10Prevention and Insurance Verification Trust Fund, which shall 11be administered by the Secretary at the direction of the 12Council. All interest earned from the investment or deposit of 13monies accumulated in the Trust Fund shall, pursuant to 14Section 4.1 of the State Finance Act, be deposited in the Trust 15Fund.16    (b) Money deposited in this Trust Fund shall not be 17considered general revenue of the State of Illinois.18    (c) Money deposited in the Trust Fund shall be used only to 19enhance efforts to effectuate the purposes of this Act as 20determined by the Council and shall not be appropriated, 21loaned or in any manner transferred to the General Revenue 22Fund of the State of Illinois.23    (d) Prior to April 1, 1991, and prior to April 1 of each   HB5012- 2 -LRB104 19760 SPS 33210 b1year thereafter, each insurer engaged in writing private 2passenger motor vehicle insurance coverages which are included 3in Class 2 and Class 3 of Section 4 of the Illinois Insurance 4Code, as a condition of its authority to transact business in 5this State, may collect and shall pay into the Trust Fund an 6amount equal to $1.00, or a lesser amount determined by the 7Council, multiplied by the insurer's total earned car years of 8private passenger motor vehicle insurance policies providing 9physical damage insurance coverage written in this State 10during the preceding calendar year.11    (d-5) Prior to April 1, 2028, and prior to April 1 of each 12year thereafter, each self-insured commercial vehicle rental 13company, as a condition of its authority to transact business 14in this State, may collect and shall pay into the Trust Fund an 15amount equal to $1.00, or a lesser amount determined by the 16Council, multiplied by each car rental contract providing 17physical damage insurance coverage written by it in this State 18during the preceding calendar year.19    (e) Money in the Trust Fund shall be expended as follows:20        (1) To pay the Secretary's costs to administer the 21    Council and the Trust Fund, but for this purpose in an 22    amount not to exceed 10% in any one fiscal year of the 23    amount collected pursuant to paragraph (d) of this Section 24    in that same fiscal year.25        (2) To achieve the purposes and objectives of this 26    Act, which may include, but not be limited to, the   HB5012- 3 -LRB104 19760 SPS 33210 b1    following:2            (A) To provide financial support to law 3        enforcement and correctional agencies, prosecutors, 4        and the judiciary for programs designed to reduce 5        vehicle hijacking and motor vehicle theft and to 6        improve the administration of motor vehicle theft 7        laws.8            (B) To provide financial support for federal and 9        State agencies, units of local government, 10        corporations and neighborhood, community or business 11        organizations for programs designed to reduce motor 12        vehicle theft and to improve the administration of 13        vehicle hijacking and motor vehicle theft laws.14            (C) To provide financial support to conduct 15        programs designed to inform owners of motor vehicles 16        about the financial and social costs of vehicle 17        hijacking, interstate shootings, and motor vehicle 18        theft and to suggest to those owners methods for 19        preventing motor vehicle theft.20            (D) To provide financial support for plans, 21        programs and projects designed to achieve the purposes 22        of this Act.23        (3) To provide funding to the Secretary's Vehicle 24    Services Department for the creation, implementation, and 25    maintenance of an electronic motor vehicle liability 26    insurance policy verification program by allocating no   HB5012- 4 -LRB104 19760 SPS 33210 b1    more than 75% of each dollar collected for the first 2    calendar year after the effective date of this amendatory 3    Act of the 100th General Assembly and no more than 10% of 4    each dollar collected for every calendar year after the 5    effective date of this amendatory Act of the 102nd General 6    Assembly. The Secretary shall distribute the funds to the 7    Vehicle Services Department at the beginning of each 8    calendar year. 9    (f) Insurers contributing to the Trust Fund shall have a 10property interest in the unexpended money in the Trust Fund, 11which property interest shall not be retroactively changed or 12extinguished by the General Assembly.13    (g) In the event the Trust Fund were to be discontinued or 14the Council were to be dissolved by act of the General Assembly 15or by operation of law, then, notwithstanding the provisions 16of Section 5 of the State Finance Act, any balance remaining 17therein shall be returned to the insurers writing private 18passenger motor vehicle insurance in proportion to their 19financial contributions to the Trust Fund and any assets of 20the Council shall be liquidated and returned in the same 21manner after deduction of administrative costs.22(Source: P.A. 102-904, eff. 1-1-23.) 23    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 241, 2027.